Utah statutes.
30-1-4.   Validity of foreign marriages -- Exceptions.

A marriage solemnized in any other country, state, or territory, if valid where solemnized,  is valid here, unless it is a marriage:

(1)  that would be prohibited and declared void in this state, under Subsection 30-1-2(1), (3), or (5); or

(2)   between parties who are related to each other within and including three degrees of consanguinity, except as provided in Subsection 30-1-1(2).



Amended by Chapter 83, 1996 General Session

